District of Columbia statutes.
24-261.01

Rules.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“CTF” means the Correctional Treatment Facility.

(2)

“Deadly force” means force which would likely cause death or serious bodily injury.

(3)

“Non-deadly force” means force that normally would neither cause death nor serious bodily injury.

(4)

“Private correctional officer” means any full-time or part-time employee of the private operator of the Correctional Treatment Facility or any other privately-operated prison facility housing inmates in the District of Columbia for the District of Columbia Department of Corrections or the Federal Bureau of Prisons, or the subcontractor of any private operator housing inmates in the District of Columbia for the District of Columbia Department of Corrections or the Federal Bureau of Prisons, whose primary responsibility is the supervision, protection, care, and control of inmates assigned to the Correctional Treatment Facility or any other privately-operated prison facility in the District of Columbia.

(5)

“Private operator” means any individual, partnership, corporation, or incorporated association bound by contract with the District of Columbia or the United States to operate the Correctional Treatment Facility or any other prison facility housing inmates in the District of Columbia for the District of Columbia Department of Corrections or the Federal Bureau of Prisons.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-276, § 2, 44 DCR 1416
May 28, 1999, D.C. Law 12-281, § 2(a)(2), 45 DCR 7991
1981 Ed., § 24-495.1.
Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 12-164 rewrote (4) and (5).
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-164 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2-6 of the Correctional Treatment Facility Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-32, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1908).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Correctional Treatment Facility Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-315, March 31, 1998, 45 DCR 2126), § 2(a) of the Correctional Treatment Facility Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-388, June 29, 1998, 45 DCR 4625), and § 2(a) of the Correctional Treatment Facility Firearms Registration and Health Occupations Licensing Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-442, September 3, 1998, 45 DCR 6517).